New York, session 2025-2026, A2589.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The civil rights law is amended by adding a new section 16 2 to read as follows: 3 § 16. Waiver of state immunity. The state hereby waives its sovereign 4 immunity in state and federal courts with regard to all claims, actions 5 and proceedings brought pursuant to the federal Americans with Disabili- 6 ties Act of 1990 (P.L. 101-336, as amended), the federal Fair Labor 7 Standards Act of 1938, the federal Age Discrimination in Employment Act 8 of 1967, and the federal Family and Medical Leave Act. The provisions 9 of such acts shall apply to the state, and any instrumentality or poli- 10 tical subdivision thereof. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00051-02-5